Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5971XC (2) 91 mb/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0w. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 299.1, subsection 5, relating to 4 absences from school because of involvement in an activity or 5 project sponsored by a 4-H club or the FFA in the same manner as 6 a school district. 7 Sec. 2. Section 299.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsection: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The board of directors of each public 10 school district and the governing body of each accredited 11 nonpublic school shall adopt a policy that requires the school 12 district or the accredited nonpublic school to grant a student 13 an excused absence when the student is absent from school 14 because of the studentâs involvement in an activity or project 15 sponsored by a 4-H club or the FFA. The policy shall also 16 require the school district or accredited nonpublic school 17 to allow a student who is absent from school because of the 18 studentâs involvement in an activity or project sponsored by a 19 4-H club or the FFA to make up any classwork the student was not 20 able to complete as a result of the absence. 21